Washington statutes.
RCW 35.10.510

Consolidation—Transfer of fire department employees.

Upon the consolidation of two or more cities or code cities, any employee of the fire department of the former city or cities who (1) was at the time of consolidation employed exclusively or principally in performing the powers, duties, and functions which are to be performed by the fire department of the consolidated city or code city, as the case may be, (2) will, as a direct consequence of consolidation, be separated from the employ of the former city, code city or town, and (3) can perform the duties and meet the minimum requirements of the position to be filled, then such employee may transfer employment to the fire department of the consolidated city, as provided in this section and RCW 35.10.520 and 35.10.530.

For purposes of this section and RCW 35.10.520 and 35.10.530, employee means an individual whose employment has been terminated because of a consolidation of two or more cities, code cities or towns.

[ 1986 c 254 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Legislative study—1986 c 254 ss 1-3: "Sections 1 through 3 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1987. The appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives shall conduct a study of the transfer rights of employees during the consolidation of cities and code cities and make recommendations to the legislature at the start of the 1987 legislative session." [ 1986 c 254 s 16.]